Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 10. General Provisions.

Collateral references. —

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 120 et seq.

Sec. 46.03.860.
Inspection warrant.

The department may seek search warrants for the purpose of investigating actual or suspected sources of pollution or contamination or to ascertain compliance or noncompliance with AS 46.14 or this chapter or a regulation adopted under AS 46.14 or this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 22 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.03.865.
Authority of department in cases of emergency.

When the department finds that an actual or imminent discharge of oil, a hazardous substance, or low level radioactive materials to the air, water, land, or subsurface land of the state poses an immediate threat to the public health or welfare or the environment of the state, it may issue an order declaring an emergency and directing a person or persons to take action the department believes necessary to meet the emergency, and protect the public health, welfare, or environment. If there is an incident command system established under AS 26.23 or AS

46.04.200

—

46.04.210

that is applicable to the situation for which the department issues an order under this subsection, the department’s exercise of authority under this subsection shall be guided by the relevant provisions of the incident command system.

A person to whom an order is directed shall comply with it immediately, but on application to the department shall be given a hearing under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). Thereafter the department may affirm, revoke, or modify the order.

During a period of emergency declared under (a) of this section, each state agency shall take whatever action the department finds necessary to meet the emergency and to protect the public health, welfare, or environment, consistent with the responsibilities assigned to them under an incident command system established under AS 26.23 or AS

46.04.200

—

46.04.210

if one is applicable to the situation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 5 ch 172 SLA 1978; am § 109 ch 59 SLA 1982; am E.O. No. 58, § 24 (1984); am § 7 ch 59 SLA 1986; am §§ 8, 9 ch 190 SLA 1990; am §§ 17, 18 ch 32 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

46.03.290

. Renumbered in 1987.

Cross references. —

For declarations of a disaster emergency under AS 26.23, see AS

46.04.080

and AS

46.09.030

; for state master contingency plan, see AS

46.04.200

.

Sec. 46.03.870.
Actionable rights.

Except as specified in AS

46.03.822

—

46.03.828

, the bases for proceedings or actions resulting from violations of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter inure solely to and are for the benefit of the state, and are not intended to in any way create new or enlarge existing rights of persons or groups of persons in the state.

Except as specified in AS

46.03.822

—

46.03.828

, a determination or order of the department does not create a presumption of law or finding of fact inuring to or for the benefit of persons other than the state.

This chapter does not estop the state, persons, or political subdivisions of the state in the exercise of their rights to suppress nuisances, to seek damages, or to otherwise abate or recover for the effects of pollution or other environmental degradation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 122 SLA 1972)

Sec. 46.03.875.
Remedies cumulative.

All remedies provided by this chapter, AS 46.04, or AS 46.14 are cumulative, and the securing of relief, whether injunctive, civil, or criminal, under a section of this chapter, AS 46.04, or AS 46.14 does not stop the state from obtaining relief under any other section of this chapter, AS 46.04, or AS 46.14.

History.

(§ 15 ch 220 SLA 1976; am § 10 ch 266 SLA 1976; am § 114 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 23 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.03.880.
Applicability of the Administrative Procedure Act.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) governs the activities and the proceedings of the department.

Notwithstanding AS

44.62.330(a)(25)

, adjudicatory hearing procedures to review permit decisions under this chapter need not conform to AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

(Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 23 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008 and 2018, in subsection (b), the reference to a specific paragraph in AS

44.62.330(a)

was corrected to reflect the renumbering of paragraphs in that subsection.

Sec. 46.03.890.
Enforcement authority.

The following persons are authorized to enforce this chapter:

a state employee authorized by the commissioner;

a police officer of the state.

Inspection and enforcement employees of the department designated by the commissioner are peace officers in the performance of their duties under this chapter, AS 46.04, AS 46.09, and AS 46.14.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; § 2 ch 116 SLA 1980; am § 16 ch 59 SLA 1986; am § 24 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was formerly AS 46.04.090(b). Renumbered in 1991.

Sec. 46.03.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“air contaminant” means dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other particulate matter, vapor, gas, odorous substances or a combination of these;

“air pollution” means the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or more air contaminants in quantities and duration that tend to be injurious to human health or welfare, animal or plant life or property or would unreasonably interfere with the enjoyment of life or property;

“broadcast chemicals” means chemical substances which are released into the air or onto land or water for the purpose of preventing, destroying, repelling, stimulating, or retarding plant or animal life, or chemical substances released for meteorological control, oil spill control, or fire control;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of environmental conservation;

“compliance agreement” means a mutual understanding and voluntary, enforceable agreement on a course of action for a specific set of circumstances entered into by the department and a person to control, prevent, or abate air, water, land, or subsurface land pollution;

“department” means the Department of Environmental Conservation;

“dispose” has the meaning given “disposal” in 42 U.S.C. 6903(3);

“facility” means any offshore or onshore structure, improvement, vessel, vehicle, land, enterprise, or endeavor;

“hazardous waste” means a waste or combination of wastes that because of quantity, concentration, or physical, chemical, or infectious characteristics may

cause, or significantly contribute to, an increase in mortality or an increase in serious irreversible or incapacitating reversible illness; or

pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment when improperly managed, treated, stored, transported, or disposed of;

“hazardous waste reduction” means decreasing, avoiding, or eliminating wastes that are hazardous to human health or the environment through source reduction or recycling; the term does not include hazardous waste treatment or hazardous waste disposal;

“industrial waste” means a liquid, gaseous, solid, or other waste substance or a combination of them resulting from process of industry, manufacturing trade or business, or from the development of natural resources; however, gravel, sand, mud, or earth taken from its original situs and put through sluice boxes, dredges, or other devices for the washing and recovery of the precious metal contained in them and redeposited in the same watershed from which it came is not industrial waste;

“low level radioactive materials” means a radioactive waste other than

used nuclear reactor fuel;

waste produced during the reprocessing of used nuclear reactor fuel; and

elements having an atomic number greater than 92 and containing 10 or more nanocuries per gram;

“manifest” means the form used for identifying the quantity, composition, origin, routing, and destination of a hazardous waste when the hazardous waste is transported;

“mining waste” means solid waste from the extraction, beneficiation, and processing of ores and minerals, including coal, and including phosphate rock and overburden from the mining of uranium ore;

“motor vehicle” has the meaning given in AS

28.90.990

;

“municipal solid waste” means waste material

generated by a household, including a single-family or multi-family residence, and collected and disposed of as part of municipal solid waste collection services; or

generated by a commercial, industrial, or institutional entity, to the extent that the waste material

is essentially the same as waste normally generated by a household;

is collected and disposed of with other municipal solid waste as part of normal municipal solid waste collection services; and

contains a relative quantity of hazardous substances not greater than the relative quantity of hazardous substances contained in waste material generated by a typical single-family household;

“other wastes” means garbage, refuse, decayed wood, sawdust, shavings, bark, trimmings from logging operations, sand, lime cinders, ashes, offal, oil, tar, dyestuffs, acids, chemicals, heat from cooling or other operations, and other substances not sewage or industrial waste which may cause or tend to cause pollution of the waters of the state;

“person” means any individual, public or private corporation, political subdivision, government agency, municipality, industry, copartnership, association, firm, trust, estate, or any other entity whatsoever;

“pesticide” means any chemical or biological agent intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating plant or animal life and any substance intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant, including but not limited to insecticides, fungicides, rodenticides, herbicides, nematocides, and biocides;

“pollution” means the contamination or altering of waters, land, or subsurface land of the state in a manner which creates a nuisance or makes waters, land, or subsurface land unclean, or noxious, or impure, or unfit so that they are actually or potentially harmful or detrimental or injurious to public health, safety, or welfare, to domestic, commercial, industrial, or recreational use, or to livestock, wild animals, bird, fish, or other aquatic life;

“resource recovery” means the recovery of materials or energy from solid wastes for industrial use, agriculture, heat production, power production, or other processes or purposes and includes the reuse of materials or products to conserve natural resources;

“restricted-use pesticides” means pesticides that are classified for restricted use under 7 U.S.C. 136a(d)(1)(C) (sec. 3(d)(1)(C), Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act), as amended;

“service” means a function performed or service provided by the state or by a municipality under a duty or power authorized by AS 29 or other provision of law authorizing a municipality to perform functions or provide services, or a comparable function performed or service provided by a village; “service” includes functions not previously performed and services not previously provided;

“sewage” means the water-carried human or animal wastes from residences, buildings, industrial establishments, or other places, together with ground water infiltration and surface water as may be present; the admixture with sewage of industrial wastes or other wastes is “sewage”;

“sewerage system” means pipelines or conduits, pumping stations, and force mains, and all other appurtenant constructions, devices, and appliances used for conducting sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes to a point of ultimate disposal;

“solid waste” means garbage, refuse, abandoned, or other discarded solid or semi-solid material, regardless of whether subject to decomposition, originating from any source;

“solid waste disposal facility” means a facility for the discharge, deposit, injection, consolidation, or placement of solid waste into or onto the land and includes transfer stations and sanitary landfills;

“solid waste processing” means extraction of materials from solid waste, volume reduction, conversion to energy, or other separation and preparation of solid waste for reuse or disposal and includes processing by incinerators, shredders, balers, and transfer stations;

“standard” means the measure of purity or quality for air, water, and land in relation to their reasonable and necessary use as established by the department;

“storage” means the containment of hazardous waste, either on a temporary basis or for a period of years, in a manner that does not constitute disposal of the hazardous waste;

[Repealed, § 61 ch 22 SLA 2015.]

“treat” has the meaning given “treatment” in 42 U.S.C. 6903(34);

“treatment works” means a plant, disposal field, lagoon, pumping station, constructed drainage ditch or surface water intercepting ditch, incinerator, area devoted to sanitary landfills, or other works installed for the purpose of treating, neutralizing, stabilizing, or disposing of sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes;

“village” means a place within the unorganized borough or within a borough as to a power, function, or service that is not exercised or provided by the borough on an areawide or nonareawide basis that

has irrevocably waived, in a form approved by the Department of Law, any claim of sovereign immunity that might arise under this chapter; and

has

a council organized under 25 U.S.C. 476 (sec. 16 of the Indian Reorganization Act);

a traditional village council recognized by the United States as eligible for federal aid to Indians; or

a council recognized by the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development under regulations adopted by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to determine and give official recognition of village entities under AS

44.33.755(b)

;

“waste associated with the exploration, development, or production of crude oil, natural gas, or geothermal energy” means (A) waste, including drilling muds, cuttings, hydrocarbons, brine, acid, sand, and emulsions or mixtures of fluids produced from and unique to the operation or maintenance of a well, whether naturally occurring or added for the operation or productivity of the well; and (B) waste that is derived intrinsically from primary field operations; “waste associated with the exploration, development, or production of crude oil, natural gas, or geothermal energy” does not include spent solvents and oils from equipment maintenance activities, discarded chemical products, or fuels;

“waste derived intrinsically from primary field operations” means waste produced from a well, and removed

at the drill site; or

at crude oil production facilities by crude oil or wastewater treatment process before custody transfer of the crude oil;

“waters” includes lakes, bays, sounds, ponds, impounding reservoirs, springs, wells, rivers, streams, creeks, estuaries, marshes, inlets, straits, passages, canals, the Pacific Ocean, Gulf of Alaska, Bering Sea, and Arctic Ocean, in the territorial limits of the state, and all other bodies of surface or underground water, natural or artificial, public or private, inland or coastal, fresh or salt, which are wholly or partially in or bordering the state or under the jurisdiction of the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am §§ 16, 17 ch 220 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 129 SLA 1977; am §§ 7, 12 ch 172 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 163 SLA 1980; am §§ 7, 14 ch 93 SLA 1981; am §§ 115, 116 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 9 ch 77 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 97 SLA 1989; am § 62 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 11 ch 83 SLA 1991; am § 53 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 11 ch 40 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 94 SLA 1998; am § 68 ch 58 SLA 1999; am §§ 10, 11 ch 136 SLA 2004; am §§ 54, 55, 61 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1984, 1989, 1991, 1998, and 2004 to alphabetize the defined terms and to maintain alphabetical order. Paragraph (16) was enacted as (37) and renumbered in 2004.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

In 2006, in (15) of this section, “AS

28.90.990

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.100

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.100

.

Cross references. —

For additional definitions applicable to AS

46.03.822

—

46.03.828

, see AS

46.03.826

.

Administrative Code. —

For nondomestic wastewater, see 18 AAC 72, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (25), deleted “ ‘sewer system’ or” at the beginning; in (28), substituted “ ‘solid waste processing’ means extraction” for “ ‘solid waste processing facility’ means a facility for the extraction”; repealed (31).

Opinions of attorney general. —

“Waters,” within the meaning of paragraph (33) (now paragraph (37)) of this section, clearly encompasses environments that are components of the marine ecosystem, but are not themselves subject to continuous inundation.
Nov. 13, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.